California statutes. Water Code
(b) No investment firm that has, or has had, a financial advisory relationship with respect to a new issue of bonds shall acquire as principal either alone or as a participant in a syndicate or other similar account formed for the purpose of purchasing, directly or indirectly, from the issuer all or any portion of the issue, or arrange for the acquisition or participation by a person controlling, controlled by, or under common control with the investment firm, unless the issue is to be sold by the issuer at competitive bid and the issuer has, prior to the bid, expressly consented in writing to the acquisition or participation. The limitations and requirements set forth in this section also apply to any investment firm controlling, controlled by, or under common control with the investment firm having a financial advisory relationship. The use of the term “indirectly” in this section does not preclude any investment firm which has a financial advisory relationship with respect to a new issue of bonds from purchasing any of those bonds from an underwriter, either for its own trading account or for the account of its customers, except to the extent that the purchase is made to contravene the purpose and intent of this section.

(c) Each financial advisory relationship shall be evidenced by a written document executed prior to, upon, or promptly after the inception of the financial advisory relationship, or promptly after the creation or selection of the issuer if the issuer does not exist or has not been determined at the time the relationship commences. That written document shall set forth the basis of compensation for the financial advisory services to be rendered, which shall be on a basis other than as a percentage of the amount of the bonds to be sold.

(d) No bond counsel with respect to a new issue of bonds shall also be counsel, with respect to that new issue of bonds, to the underwriter or other initial purchaser of the bonds. This section does not preclude the bond counsel from rendering one or more opinions to the underwriter or purchaser with respect to the bonds, the documents or laws pursuant to which the bonds are issued, the official statement, offering circular, or other disclosure document describing the bonds, or any related matter, if the opinion is rendered as bond counsel and not as counsel to the underwriter or purchaser.

(e) Injunctive relief shall be available, subject to judicial discretion, to prohibit or enjoin any violation of this section, but no violation shall affect the authority, validity, or enforceability of bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 645, Sec. 2.5.   Effective September 17, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

36064.

Bonds may be refunded by defeasance or call for redemption, subject to all of the following requirements:

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 53557 and 53585 of the Government Code, the proceeds of the sale of refunding bonds deposited in escrow or trust may be invested or reinvested in any combination of federal securities and securities permitted by subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 53635 of the Government Code, except that investment and reinvestment of the proceeds shall not be permitted in securities issued by the district or on behalf of any of its improvement districts. The ratings of any securities permitted by subdivision (d) of Section 53635 of the Government Code in which the escrow or trust is invested or reinvested, or debt service insurance or other credit enhancement with respect to those securities, or any combination thereof, shall produce a rating on those securities when acquired equivalent to the highest long-term debt rating category of either Moody’s Investors Service, Inc., or Standard and Poor’s Corporation. Notwithstanding Section 53584 of the Government Code, the securities may be acquired from the issuer thereof or any other source approved by the board.

(b) The escrow or trust shall be established in an amount sufficient to pay when due the principal of, redemption premium, if any, and interest on, the bonds being refunded. Securities in the escrow or trust may be exchanged or sold and the proceeds used to purchase other securities only when the escrow agent or trustee holding the fund deems the exchange or sale necessary to maintain the ability to pay when due the principal of, redemption premium, if any, and interest on, the bonds being refunded. If the escrow or trust becomes insufficient to pay the principal, redemption premium, if any, and interest when due, the board may, to the extent of the insufficiency, augment the escrow or trust from assessments or charges, or both, fixed and collected for that purpose, notwithstanding Section 53561 of the Government Code and Section 36063 of this code.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 53583 of the Government Code, the bonds being refunded need not be called and paid at the first or any subsequent date on which the bonds may legally be called, if the board determines that to do so would be consistent with prudent management of the district’s fiscal affairs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 340, Sec. 1.   Effective July 29, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Provisions Relating to General Obligation Bonds Only [36150. - 36215.]



  ARTICLE 1. Bond Issuance [36150. - 36153.]

36150.

If a general obligation bond issue is contemplated, there shall be included in the estimate required by Section 35950 every expense of the district that it is probable will be incurred and become payable before the expiration of one year from the completion of the irrigation works, including the interest on any bonds of the district due and payable prior to that date, for which the money of the district then in the treasury or thereafter to be received from an assessment previously levied is inadequate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36153.

In addition to any and all other provisions of this division and any other applicable laws for the issuance of general obligation bonds by a district, general obligation bonds may be issued by a district if the proceeds are to be used to construct facilities in compliance with an order adopted by the State Department of Health Services pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 116275) of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code. Bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be issued by a district as otherwise provided in this division without regard to the election procedures of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 35150) of Part 4 and shall be secured by unlimited ad valorem assessments on land in the district without regard to any limitations set forth in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2201) of Part 4 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. If 50 percent or more of the voters within the district or if the owners of 50 percent or more of the assessed valuation within the district submit written protests to the district secretary within the 30 days after the date the board adopts the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, the proceedings for the issuance of bonds pursuant to this section shall be terminated and no further proceedings shall be taken pursuant to this section for a period of at least one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 366.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Sale and Exchange of Bonds [36170. - 36172.]

36170.

The board may order general obligation bonds sold at not less than 90 percent of par value when the board deems it for the best interest of the district to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36171.

General obligation bonds may be exchanged dollar for dollar for bonds of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36172.

Bonds of the State that may be received for general obligation bonds shall be placed to the credit of the district to be sold as the board may direct, for not less than par value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Miscellaneous Provisions [36190. - 36202.]

36190.

General obligation bonds shall be in such form as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1329.)
-------------------------------------------

36191.

General obligation bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

36192.

Each issue or series of an issue of general obligation bonds shall be numbered consecutively, and the bonds of each issue or series of an issue shall be numbered consecutively from lower to higher as they mature and bear such date as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1329.)
-------------------------------------------

36193.

General obligation bonds shall be signed by the president and attested by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

36194.

General obligation bonds shall be of such denomination or denominations as the board may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

36195.

General obligation bonds shall be payable at such time or times and place or places as may be designated by the board, but in no case shall the maturity of any bond be more than 40 years from its date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1329.)
-------------------------------------------

36196.

Each general obligation bond shall be made payable at a given time for its full face value and not for a percentage thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

36197.

A general obligation bond shall be payable when due upon presentation and surrender thereof to the treasurer by the holder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

36198.

General obligation bonds shall bear interest at a rate not in excess of 8 percent per annum payable annually or semiannually as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

36199.

The interest on general obligation bonds shall be payable at such place or places as may be prescribed by the board upon the presentation and surrender of the proper coupons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1329.)
-------------------------------------------

36200.

The interest coupons shall be in such form as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1329.)
-------------------------------------------

36201.

Coupons for each installment of interest shall be attached to the bonds, numbered the same as the bonds, and signed by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1329.)
-------------------------------------------

36202.

All the signatures on the bond or coupons may be printed, lithographed or otherwise mechanically reproduced, except that one of the signatures on the bond shall be manually affixed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1329.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Destruction and Redemption of Bonds [36210. - 36215.]

36210.

Whenever a district has any of its unsold general obligation bonds which it is not necessary to sell for the purpose of raising funds, the board may, at a general election, or at a special election called for the purpose, submit the proposition of whether or not the bonds should be destroyed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36211.

The notice of the election at which general obligation bonds are proposed to be destroyed shall specify, in addition to the requirements provided in Section 35002:

(a) The amount of the bonded indebtedness authorized.

(b) The amount of the bonds remaining unsold.

(c) The amount of bonds proposed to be destroyed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36212.

If at the time the vote cast at the election is canvassed a two-thirds majority of the votes cast upon the proposition favors the destruction of the unsold general obligation bonds, the president, in the presence of a majority of the members of the board, shall destroy the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1329.)
-------------------------------------------

36213.

The amount of the general obligation bonds destroyed shall be deducted from the total amount authorized to be issued and no part of the bonds destroyed shall thereafter be reprinted or reissued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36213.1.

If the unsold general obligation bonds shall not have been printed, the election provided for in this article shall be called and held to determine whether the authority to issue and sell said unprinted bonds shall be revoked. If two-thirds of the votes cast upon the proposition favor such revocation, the authority to issue and sell said unprinted bonds shall be revoked, the amount thereof deducted from the total amount authorized to be issued, and no part of said bonds shall thereafter be printed or issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1329.)
-------------------------------------------

36214.

Whenever the funds of the district are in excess of the amount necessary to complete the construction of the irrigation works or to acquire the property and rights in property necessary therefor, to supply all the land with sufficient water for irrigation purposes, and to pay every obligation of the district that is due and payable or that will, or probably will, become due and payable before the expiration of two years from the date on which the last preceding tax of the district was levied, the board may direct the treasurer to pay with the excess, specifying the amount, the portion of the sold general obligation bonds of the district as the excess sum of money will redeem at the lowest value at which they may be obtained for liquidation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36215.

The provisions of Sections 36303, 36304, 36305 and 36348 shall also be applicable to general obligation bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1329.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Alternate Provisions for the Issuance of General Obligation Bonds [36250. - 36262.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [36250. - 36250.]

36250.

The provisions of this chapter are in addition to any and all other provisions of this division, the California Water District Law, and any other applicable laws for the issuance of general obligation bonds by a district or an improvement district thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1458.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Authorization of Bonds and Issuance [36251. - 36262.]

36251.

In the event the board determines to provide for the issuance of general obligation bonds under the provisions of this chapter, it shall prepare and adopt a plan of works and an estimate of the amount of money necessary to raise for such purposes for which bonds may be issued. The estimate required pursuant to this section shall include every expense of the district which it is probable will be incurred and become payable before the expiration of one year from the completion of the works, including the interest on any bonds of the district to be due and payable prior to the date for which the money of the district then in the treasury or thereafter to be received from an assessment previously levied is inadequate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1458.)
-------------------------------------------

36252.

Bonds may be issued for the purposes of acquiring or constructing works for irrigation, domestic, municipal and industrial water supply and to furnish facilities and services within or without the district to the extent provided for in Section 35500 for the collection, treatment and disposal of sewage, waste and storm water including the acquisition of necessary property for these works, acquiring funds to fulfill contractual commitments to carry out the powers and purposes of the district contained in contracts with other agencies, acquiring all or part of the operating funds for the district, the total amount of such funds so acquired not to exceed at any time an amount equal to the total operating costs of the district for a two-year period as estimated by its board, acquiring any property necessary for the purposes of the district, and otherwise carrying out the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1458.)
-------------------------------------------

36253.

Subsequent to the receipt of the plan of works provided for in Section 36251, the board may approve or modify the proposed plan of works, and thereafter by the adoption of a resolution may declare its intention to issue general obligation bonds to acquire or construct improvements described in the approved plan of works and to issue general obligation bonds of the district, or on behalf of an improvement district thereof, the interest and principal of which shall be paid by annual ad valorem taxes on the taxable land within the district or improvement district. In such case the resolution shall state the following:

(a) It is the intention of the board to acquire or construct improvements described in the approved plan of works and to issue general obligation bonds, the proceeds of which shall be used to pay the expenses thereof as set forth in the estimate provided for in Section 36251.

(b) A description of the purpose of the plan.

(c) The estimated expense of carrying out the plan of works.

(d) Assessments for carrying out such purpose shall be levied exclusively on the lands of the district or improvement district, including any territory annexed thereto.

(e) A map of the exterior boundaries of the district or improvement district is on file with the secretary of the district and is available for inspection by any person or persons interested.

(f) The date, time and place of the hearing by the board in regard to the foregoing plan at which time the board will, thereupon, determine the benefit or lack thereof to the lands within the district or improvement district thereof and, at which time all interested persons will be heard and written protests, if any, will be considered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1458.)
-------------------------------------------

36254.

Notice of such hearing shall be given by publishing a copy of the resolution provided for in Section 36253 in a newspaper of general circulation, published in each affected county, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, the first publication to be at least 14 days prior to the time fixed for hearing. Such notice shall also be given by posting a copy of the resolution in three public places within the district or the improvement district, for at least 14 days prior to the time fixed for the hearing. Also notice thereof shall be given by certified mailing a certified copy of the resolution to each property owner shown on the last equalized assessment roll. The mailing of such notices shall be completed not less than 14 days prior to the hearing. No other notice other than that required by this section need be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1458.)
-------------------------------------------

36255.

At any time not later than the hour set for hearing objections to the proposed plan of works and the issuance of general obligation bonds therefor, any owner of property liable to be assessed therefor may make written protest. Such protest shall be in writing, shall contain a description of the property in which each signer has an interest, sufficient to identify the same and if the signers are not shown on the last equalized assessment roll as the owners of such property, such protest shall contain or be accompanied by written evidence that such signers are the owners of such property. All such protests shall be delivered to the secretary of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 322.)
-------------------------------------------

36256.

At the time set for hearing protests, the board shall hear and pass upon all protests made as provided for in Section 36254 and its decision shall be final and conclusive. The board may adjourn the hearings from time to time and any written protest may be withdrawn by an owner making the same in writing at any time prior to the conclusion of the hearing or any such adjournment thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1458.)
-------------------------------------------

36257.

If a majority written protest is made pursuant to Section 36255 against the plan of works, the proposed issuance of general obligation bonds therefor or the amount thereof, and the board finds that the protest is made by either one-half or more of the area proposed to be assessed for the payment of the general obligation bonds proposed to be issued, or more than one-half of the assessed valuation of the land within the boundaries of the district or the improvement district to be assessed for the payment of the interest and principal of the general obligation bonds proposed to be issued, and such protests are not withdrawn so as to reduce the same to less than a majority in either instance, the proceedings shall be terminated and no further proceedings shall be taken for a period of one year from the date of the decision of the board on the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1458.)
-------------------------------------------

36258.

The last equalized assessment roll shall be used as a basis for determining whether or not a majority written protest has been made. The board shall be under no duty to obtain or consider any other evidence as to ownership of property and its determination of ownership shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1458.)
-------------------------------------------

36259.

If at the conclusion of the hearing the board determines that all of the lands included within the district and the boundaries of the improvement district described in the plan of works will be benefited and a majority protest as provided for in this article has not been received, the board may thereafter issue general obligation bonds of the district or the improvement district in an amount not in excess of the estimate provided for in Section 36251. Any bonds authorized to be issued to accomplish the plan of works as provided for in Section 36251 for the district or for an improvement district shall be issued and sold in the same manner and upon the same terms and conditions as other general obligation bonds of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1458.)
-------------------------------------------

36260.

Bonds issued hereunder and interest which accrues thereon shall be paid in a manner identical to bonds issued on behalf of a district or improvement district of a California water district as otherwise provided in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1458.)
-------------------------------------------

36261.

The Special Assessment Investigation, Limitation and Majority Protest Act of 1931 shall not apply to any proceedings under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1458.)
-------------------------------------------

36262.

The board may, without a vote of the electors, or without a further hearing, provide for the issuance of, and issue, general obligation bonds of a district or for an improvement district thereof in accordance with the following:

(a) The principal amount of such bonds does not exceed the then unissued balance of the principal amount of bonds of a district, or of such improvement district, authorized pursuant to the provisions of this chapter prior to January 1, 1974.

(b) The bonds are issued for the purpose set forth in the plan of works adopted for such authorized bonds or as such plan of works may be modified pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 35950) of Chapter 2 of this part.

(c) The bonds are issued in accordance with the provisions of this division, except for the requirement of a bond election or notice and hearing.

Bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be secured by unlimited ad valorem assessments on land in the district or in the improvement district without regard to any limitations set forth in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2201) of Part 4 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

When bonds are issued pursuant to this section, unissued bonds as referred to in subdivisions (a) and (b) in a principal amount at least equal to the principal amount of bonds issued pursuant to this section, shall be canceled by order of the board and shall not be issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1376.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Provisions Relating to Revenue Bonds Only [36300. - 36368.]



  ARTICLE 1. Bond Issuance [36300. - 36305.]

36300.

If a revenue bond issue is contemplated, there shall be included in the estimate required by Section 35950 every expense of the district that it is probable will be incurred for and limited to the purpose of acquiring or constructing works for irrigation, domestic, municipal, and industrial water supply and to furnish facilities and services within or without the district to the extent provided for in Section 35500 for the collection, treatment, and disposal of sewage, waste, and storm water, including the acquisition of necessary property and property rights therefor, acquiring funds to fulfill contractual commitments to carry out the powers and purposes of the district contained in contracts with other agencies, acquiring all or part of the operating funds for the district, the total amount of such funds so to be acquired not to exceed an amount equal to the total operating costs of the district for a two-year period as estimated by its board, including the interest on such bonds to be due and payable prior to the date on which revenues of the district will be available for the payment thereof, acquiring any property necessary for the purposes of the district and otherwise carry out the provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 9.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

36301.

Revenue bonds shall be issued in the name of the district and shall be obligations of the district, limited, however, to the payment or redemption of the revenue bonds and the payment of interest thereon from the revenues of the district, or such portion thereof as may be prescribed by the district by order or by contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36302.

Revenue bonds are not a general debt, liability, or obligation of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36303.

The board may, in the resolution authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds, provide that the bonds or any part thereof shall be subject to call and redemption before maturity, at the option of the district, at such price or prices as may be fixed in the resolution, not exceeding a premium of 6 percent of the par value of the revenue bonds so subject to redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

36304.

Revenue bonds issued subject to call and redemption prior to maturity shall contain a recital to that effect on the face of the revenue bonds, and no revenue bond shall be subject to call or redemption prior to its fixed maturity date unless it contains such recital.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

36305.

The board in its resolution authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds shall fix the method of giving notice of redemption to the holders of revenue bonds to be redeemed and the price or prices at which the revenue bonds shall be subject to redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1756.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Lien of Bonds [36320. - 36323.]

36320.

The payment of both principal and interest of revenue bonds shall be secured only by the revenues pledged therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 10.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

36321.

No holder of any revenue bond may ever compel any exercise of the taxing power to pay the bond, interest thereon, or any part of either.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36322.

All revenue bonds of the same issue shall, subject to the prior and superior rights of outstanding bonds, claims, or obligations, and notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in Section 35471, have a prior and paramount lien on the revenue pledged for the payment or redemption thereof and the payment of interest thereon over and ahead of all revenue bonds of any issue which may be subsequently issued and over and ahead of any claims or obligations of any nature against the revenue subsequently arising or subsequently incurred. This section shall not prohibit the district from making provisions, at the time of issuance and sale of revenue bonds, for the subsequent issuance of parity lien bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 11.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

36323.

All revenue bonds of the same issue shall be equally and ratably secured without priority by reason of number, date of bonds, of sale, of execution, or of delivery, by a lien on the district’s revenue in accordance with the provisions of this division and the resolutions authorizing the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Miscellaneous Provisions [36340. - 36352.]

36340.

Revenue bonds and interest coupons attached thereto shall be in such form as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

36341.

The face of each revenue bond shall state:

(a) That the payment or redemption of the bond and the payment of the interest thereon is secured solely by a first and direct charge and lien upon all or the portion, as prescribed by the district by order or by contract, of the revenues pledged therefor.

(b) That neither the payment of all or any part of the principal or interest thereon is a general debt, liability, or obligation of the district.

(c) That the bond is subject to call and redemption prior to maturity, if the board has so provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 12.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

36342.

Revenue bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

36343.

Each issue of revenue bonds shall be numbered consecutively and the bonds of each issue shall be numbered consecutively from lower to higher as they mature and shall bear such date as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

36344.

The date appearing upon the face of a revenue bond shall be deemed to be the date of issuance irrespective of the subsequent delivery of the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

36345.

Revenue bonds shall be signed by the president and attested by the secretary, and interest coupons appertaining thereto shall be signed by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

36346.

All the signatures on the bond or coupons may be printed, lithographed, engraved, or otherwise mechanically reproduced, except that one of the signatures shall be manually affixed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

36347.

The seal of the district may be affixed to the revenue bonds by mechanical reproduction thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

36348.

If any officer whose signature appears on any revenue bond or coupon ceases to be such officer of the district before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, his signature on the bond or coupon is valid and sufficient for all purposes with like force and effect as though he had remained in office until the actual delivery of the bonds and payment of the purchase price thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

36349.

Revenue bonds shall be of such denomination or denominations as the board may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

36350.

Revenue bonds shall be payable at such time and place as may be designated by the board, but in no case shall the maturity of any bond be more than 40 years from its date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

36351.

Every revenue bond shall be payable at a given time for its entire amount and not for a percentage thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

36352.

Revenue bonds shall bear interest at a rate not in excess of 8 percent per annum, payable annually or semiannually as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Action to Secure Payment of Revenue Bonds [36360. - 36368.]

36360.

Bondholders owning or holding 25 percent or more of any outstanding and unpaid issue of revenue bonds may, when payments of principal or interest, or both, have been in default for not less than one year, institute proceedings in the superior court of the principal county to compel the district to fix and collect sufficient charges for the sale of water for the irrigation of land to pay when due the principal and interest of revenue bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36361.

The complaint shall:

(a) Name the district as a defendant.

(b) State that on the date therein named bond principal payments, interest thereon, or both, were in default for a period of more than one year.

(c) Pray:

(1) That the district be adjudged in default of payments of its obligations as they mature.

(2) That a receiver be appointed by the court to manage and conduct the affairs of the district, fix and collect charges for the sale of water for the irrigation of the land sufficient to pay all accumulated and unpaid revenue bond principal and interest charges.

(3) That the receiver be vested with such other duties as the court may determine to be for the best interests of the district and the owners and holders of its outstanding and unpaid revenue bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36362.

The summons in the proceeding shall be served by publishing a copy thereof once a week for four weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36363.

Within 30 days after publication of the summons has been completed and proof filed with the court any person may appear and answer the complaint.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36364.

On the expiration of 60 days after the publication of summons has been completed and proof filed with the court, after proof to the court that a default exists and continues, the court shall assume jurisdiction over the affairs of the district and appoint a receiver for the purposes set forth in the complaint.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36365.

The jurisdiction of the court over the affairs of the district shall continue until the default for which the receiver was appointed has been discharged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36366.

A receiver has no power to dispose of any part of the property of the district except in the ordinary course of business. The authority of a receiver is limited to the operation and maintenance of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36367.

No court has jurisdiction to enter any order or decree requiring or permitting a receiver to sell, assign, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of or encumber the district or any part thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36368.

Whenever all that is due upon all obligations and interest thereon which are a charge, lien, or encumbrance on the revenues of the district has been paid and all defaults have been cured and made good, the court, after such notice and hearing as it deems reasonable and proper, shall direct the receiver to surrender jurisdiction over the affairs of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.3. Revenue Warrants [36380. - 36393.]

36380.

A district whose facilities are for delivery primarily of agricultural water supplies and wherein at least 51 percent of the assessable acreage is zoned and developed for agricultural uses may issue revenue warrants pursuant to this chapter to obtain funds for any lawful purpose of the district, including the repayment of indebtedness of the district. A district may issue revenue warrants pursuant to this chapter in any year only if the district does not receive during such year its full contractual entitlement under a water supply contract with the United States, the State of California, or any other public agency, upon which contract the district relies for meeting a substantial portion of its water supply needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

36381.

Revenue warrants shall be secured by all or part of the revenues received by the district from charges fixed pursuant to Section 35470 or from any other source other than assessments, and any such revenues may be pledged to the payment of revenue warrants. In the resolution authorizing issuance of revenue warrants, the board may subject such revenues as it specifies to a lien or charge to secure the payment of the principal of, and the interest on, revenue warrants, but such warrants shall be not secured by any lien or charge upon any assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

36382.

Revenue warrants shall bear interest at a rate or rates not exceeding 8 percent per annum, payable annually or semiannually or in part annually and in part semiannually, as the board may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

36383.

Revenue warrants shall mature at such time or times as the board may prescribe, but not more than 10 years from the date of issuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

36384.
